District of Columbia statutes.
24-263.02

Prohibited charges in government contracts.

In any contract to which the District of Columbia is a party that is for the holding or incarceration of persons charged or convicted in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, such contract shall prohibit surcharges, commissions, or other financial impositions that are in addition to the legally established rates for calls made by any inmate subject to the contract. The District of Columbia government shall seek to obtain quality service for the least cost to the individual party paying for the telephone call by an inmate subject to the contract.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-280, § 3, 48 DCR 1885